North Dakota, session 69, HB1089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 1-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Agendas, plans, or resolutions approved by an international organization ineffective
in this state.
An agenda, plan, or resolution adopted by the United Nations directly naming and imposing
a rule on this state or a political subdivision of this state which directly infringes upon or restricts
property rights of any resident of this state is void and ineffective. This section does not
preclude the legislative assembly or governing body of a political subdivision of this state from
enacting a law similar or identical to a United Nations agenda, plan, or resolution.
Page No. 1 25.0078.03000